Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1205
Matching funds.

The matching funds required to obtain the federal share of the services described in section 68-1202 may come from either state, county, or donated sources in amounts and other provisions to be determined by the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1973, LB 511, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 346;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 67;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 278.